Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.584

Term papers, theses, dissertations, sale of prohibited—Violations enumerated—Exempted acts—Civil penalties—Injunctive relief.

(1) No person shall prepare, offer to prepare, cause to be prepared, sell, or offer for sale to any other person, including any student enrolled in a postsecondary institution, any assignment knowing, or under the circumstances having reason to know, that said assignment is intended for submission either in whole or substantial part under a student's name in fulfillment of the requirements for a degree, diploma, certificate, or course of study at any postsecondary institution.

(2) No person shall sell or offer for sale to any student enrolled in a postsecondary institution any assistance in the preparation, research or writing of an assignment knowing or under the circumstances having reason to know, that said assignment is intended for submission either in whole or substantial part under said student's name to such educational institution in fulfillment of the requirements for a degree, diploma, certificate, or course of study.

(3) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent any person from providing tutorial assistance, research material, information, or other assistance to persons enrolled in a postsecondary institution which is not intended for submission in whole or in substantial part as an assignment under the student's name to such institution. Nor shall any person be prevented by this section from rendering services for a monetary fee which includes typing, assembling, transcription, reproduction, or editing of a manuscript or other assignment: PROVIDED, That such services are not rendered with the intent of making substantive changes in a manuscript or other assignment.

(4) Any person violating any provision of RCW 28B.10.580, 28B.10.582 or 28B.10.584 shall be subject to civil penalties of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation. Any court of competent jurisdiction is hereby authorized to grant such further relief as is necessary to enforce the provisions of this section, including the issuance of an injunction.

(5) Any person against whom a judgment has been entered pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, shall upon any subsequent violation of RCW 28B.10.580, 28B.10.582 or 28B.10.584 be subject to civil penalties not to exceed ten thousand dollars. Any court of competent jurisdiction is hereby authorized to grant such further relief as is necessary to enforce the provisions of this section, including the issuance of an injunction.

(6) Actions for injunction under the provisions of this section may be brought in the name of the state of Washington upon the complaint of the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney in the name of the state of Washington.

[ 1979 c 43 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 43: See note following RCW 28B.10.580.